Florida, session 2026, SB1672.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 212.1836, Florida Statutes, is created 26 to read: 27 212.1836âHomebuyer Workforce Tax Credit.â 28 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 29 (a)ââEligible employeeâ means a person who has established 30 permanent residency in the state and who has not previously 31 owned a home in the state. 32 (b)ââEligible expensesâ means a down payment or any closing 33 costs. 34 (c)ââEligible taxpayerâ means an employer who has operated 35 in the state for at least 3 consecutive years. 36 (d)ââEmployer contributionâ means a monetary contribution 37 of at least $1,000 from an employer to his or her employee 38 pursuant to this section. 39 (e)ââQualifying home purchaseâ means property purchased by 40 an eligible employee as a primary residence. 41 (2)âAn eligible taxpayer may receive a tax credit for 100 42 percent of the employer contribution to an eligible employee to 43 pay for eligible expenses related to a qualifying home purchase. 44 A taxpayer may not receive more than $5,000 of credit for 45 contributions made to a single employee. 46 (3)âAn eligible taxpayer may receive a tax credit for 100 47 percent of a contribution made to a government program offering 48 down payment assistant to residents of the state, including the 49 Florida Hometown Hero program under s. 420.5096. 50 (4)âA taxpayer may submit an application to the department 51 for a tax credit under subsection (2) or subsection (3). 52 (5)âThe credit under this section may be used against any 53 tax due for the taxable year under chapter 220 or under s. 54 624.509(1). 55 (6)âThe department shall approve applications on a first 56 come, first-served basis. The department may authorize $5 57 million in tax credits in each of state fiscal years 2026-2027, 58 2027-2028, and 2028-2029. 59 (7)âIf a tax credit approved under subsection (6) is not 60 fully used for the specified taxable year because of 61 insufficient tax liability on the part of the taxpayer, the 62 unused amount may be carried forward for a period not to exceed 63 3 taxable years. 64 (8)âA taxpayer may not convey, transfer, or assign an 65 approved tax credit or carryforward tax credit to another 66 entity. 67 (9)âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 68 this section, including rules establishing application forms, 69 procedures governing the approval and carryforward of tax 70 credits, and procedures to be followed by taxpayers when 71 claiming approved tax credits on their returns. 72 (10)âThis section is repealed January 1, 2030, unless 73 reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 74 Legislature. 75 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.